Utah statutes.
62A-11-306.2.   Mandatory review and adjustment of child support orders for TANF recipients.

If a child support order has not been issued, adjusted, or modified within the previous three years and the children who are the subject of the order currently receive TANF funds, the office shall review the order, and if appropriate, move the tribunal to adjust the amount of the order if there is a difference of 10% or more between the payor's ordered support amount and the payor's support amount required under the guidelines.

